Utah statutes.
31A-5-103.   Orders imposing and relaxing restrictions.

(1)  The commissioner may by order subject an individual corporation not otherwise subject to some or all of the restrictions of Subsections 31A-5-304(4), 31A-5-305(1)(a), 31A-5-305(2)(a)(i) and (ii), and 31A-5-410(1)(b) if he finds after a hearing that the individual corporation's financial condition, management, and other circumstances require additional regulation for the protection of the interests of insureds or the public.  The commissioner shall detail in writing the grounds for his order.

(2)  The commissioner may by order free a new corporation from any or all of the restrictions generally applicable to new corporations under the provisions listed in Subsection (1), if he is satisfied that the corporation's financial condition, management, and other circumstances give assurance that the interests of insureds and the public will not be endangered by doing so.

